Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2701.09
Certified service provider, defined.

Certified service provider means an agent certified under the streamlined sales and use tax agreement to perform all of the seller's sales tax collection functions, other than to remit tax on its own retail purchases.

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 13.